Utah statutes.
16-10a-1407.   Disposition of claims by publication -- Disposition in
absence of publication.
(1)  A dissolved corporation may publish notice of its dissolution and request
that persons with claims against the corporation present them in accordance
with the notice.
(2)  The notice contemplated in Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  be published:
(i)  one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the
dissolved corporation's principal office is or was located or, if it has no
principal office in this state, in Salt Lake County; and
(ii)  as required in Section 45-1-101;
(b)  describe the information that must be included in a claim and provide an
address at which any claim must be given to the corporation; and
(c)  state that unless sooner barred by any other statute limiting actions,
the claim will be barred if an action to enforce the claim is not commenced
within five years after the publication of the notice.
(3)  If the dissolved corporation publishes a newspaper or website notice in
accordance with Subsection (2), then unless sooner barred under Section
16-10a-1406 or under any other statute limiting actions, the claim of any
claimant against the dissolved corporation is barred unless the claimant
commences an action to enforce the claim against the dissolved corporation
within five years after the publication date of the notice.
(4) (a)  For purposes of this section, "claim" means any claim, including
claims of this state, whether known, due or to become due, absolute or
contingent, liquidated or unliquidated, founded on contract, tort, or other
legal basis, or otherwise.
(b)  For purposes of this section, an action to enforce a claim includes any
civil action, and any arbitration under any agreement for binding arbitration
between the dissolved corporation and the claimant.
(5)  If a dissolved corporation does not publish a newspaper notice in
accordance with Subsection (2), then unless sooner barred under Section
16-10a-1406 or under any other statute limiting actions, the claim of any
claimant against the dissolved corporation is barred unless the claimant
commences an action to enforce the claim against the dissolved corporation
within seven years after the date the corporation was dissolved.
